Idaho statutes. Title 7 SPECIAL PROCEEDINGS
Chapter 4
WRITS OF PROHIBITION

Sec.

§ 7-401. Definition.

The writ of prohibition is the counterpart of the writ of mandate. It arrests the proceedings of any tribunal, corporation, board or person, when such proceedings are without or in excess of the jurisdiction of such tribunal, corporation, board or person.

§ 7-401. Definition.

The writ of prohibition is the counterpart of the writ of mandate. It arrests the proceedings of any tribunal, corporation, board or person, when such proceedings are without or in excess of the jurisdiction of such tribunal, corporation, board or person.

§ 7-402. When and how issued.

It may be issued by the supreme court or any district court to an inferior tribunal, or to a corporation, board or person in all cases where there is not a plain, speedy and adequate remedy in the ordinary course of law. It is issued upon affidavit on the application of the person beneficially interested.

Parties.

Same degree of strictness in regard to parties is not maintained in prohibition as in mandate; writ of prohibition may be issued on application of any person shown to be interested in the litigation; he need not necessarily be named as a party in the original action; he may make himself a party by showing that he has an interest in controversy and by moving to set aside judgment or order made without or in excess of jurisdiction. Cronan v. District Court, 15 Idaho 184, 96 P. 768 (1908).
State was not entitled to a writ of prohibition to enjoin a district court from assessing fees for a special master against the state because the appointment of special masters and the assessment of special master costs were matters within the discretion of the district courts. Clear statutory authority existed for the award of such fees, as well direction as to how costs awarded against the state were to be paid. State v. District Court, 143 Idaho 695, 152 P.3d 566 (2007).

Parties.

§ 7-403. Alternative and peremptory writs.

The writs must be either alternative or peremptory. The alternative writ must state generally the allegation against the party to whom it is directed, and command such party to desist or refrain from further proceedings in the action or matter specified therein until the further order of the court from which it is issued, or to show cause before such court, at a specified time and place, why such party should not be absolutely restrained from any further proceedings in such action or matter. The peremptory writ must be in a similar form, except that the words requiring the party to show cause why he should not be absolutely restrained, etc., must be omitted and a return day inserted.

§ 7-404. Application of mandamus procedure.

The provisions of the preceding sections from 7-305 to 7-314, both inclusive, apply to the proceedings for writ of prohibition.